Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.091

Inspection of nursing homes and community-based services—Notice of violations—Approval of alterations or new facilities.

(1) The department shall inspect each nursing home periodically in accordance with federal standards under 42 C.F.R. Part 488, Subpart E. The inspection shall be made without providing advance notice of it. Every inspection may include an inspection of every part of the premises and an examination of all records, methods of administration, the general and special dietary and the stores and methods of supply. Those nursing homes that provide community-based care shall establish and maintain separate and distinct accounting and other essential records for the purpose of appropriately allocating costs of the providing of such care: PROVIDED, That such costs shall not be considered allowable costs for reimbursement purposes under chapter 74.46 RCW. Following such inspection or inspections, written notice of any violation of this law or the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder, shall be given to the applicant or licensee and the department. The notice shall describe the reasons for the facility's noncompliance. The department may prescribe by regulations that any licensee or applicant desiring to make specified types of alterations or additions to its facilities or to construct new facilities shall, before commencing such alteration, addition or new construction, submit its plans and specifications therefor to the department for preliminary inspection and approval or recommendations with respect to compliance with the regulations and standards herein authorized.

(2) If a pandemic, natural disaster, or other declared state of emergency prevents the department from completing inspections according to the timeline in subsection (1) of this section, the department shall adopt rules to reestablish inspection timelines based on the length of time since the last complete inspection, compliance history of each facility, immediate health or safety concerns, and centers for medicare and medicaid services requirements.

(a) Rules adopted under this subsection (2) are effective until the termination of the pandemic, natural disaster, or other declared state of emergency or until the department determines that all facility inspections are occurring according to time frames established in subsection (1) of this section, whichever occurs later. Once the department determines a rule adopted under this subsection (2) is no longer necessary, it must repeal the rule under RCW 34.05.353.

(b) Within 12 months of the termination of the pandemic, natural disaster, or other declared state of emergency, the department shall conduct a review of inspection compliance with subsection (1) of this section and provide the legislature with a report.

[ 2021 c 203 s 4; 2020 c 263 s 1; 1987 c 476 s 24; 1983 c 236 s 2; 1981 2nd ex.s. c 11 s 3; 1979 ex.s. c 211 s 63.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Retroactive application—2021 c 203: See notes following RCW 43.43.832.

Construction—1983 c 236: See note following RCW 18.51.010.

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 211: See RCW 74.42.920.

Nursing home standards: Chapter 74.42 RCW.